Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Secretary of State

§ 17-19-130.
Powers.

The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of him by this act. The secretary of state shall promulgate reasonable forms, rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both sentences, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).